Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-924
Regional program responsibility, defined.

Regional program responsibility shall mean an identifiable geographic area for service delivery by a system, area, or institution. The intrastate or interstate area or region serves as the base for justifying existing and proposed new or expanded program responsibilities.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 8.